South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4698.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-1-200. (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, if a vacancy occurs in a state agency, other than an institution of higher learning, or if an agency acts to fill a new position, the agency must give preference to a veteran, if the applicants are equally qualified for the vacancy or new position. (B) The State and its political subdivisions may waive a postsecondary educational requirement for a veteran applicant. (C) Each state agency and political subdivision shall develop and implement a written Veterans' Recruitment Plan that establishes annual goals for ensuring the full use of veterans in the agency's or political subdivision's workforce and shall present such plan to the Office of Human Resources of the Department of Administration. (D) By February first of each year, each state agency must submit statistical data to the Department of Employment and Workforce's Coordinating Council on Workforce Development on the number of persons who claim a veterans' preference, the number of persons who are hired through veterans' preference, and the number of persons who are hired as a result of the veterans' recruitment plan. The Department of Employment and Workforce must update the statistical data required by this subsection annually on its website and include such statistical data in its annual workforce report. (E) For purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same meaning as provided in Section 25-11-40. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----